.config/sublime-text-3/Packages/User/en_ru.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY 'ABCDEFGHIKLMNOPRSTUVWYZabcdefghiklmnoprstuvwyz
FLAG NUMBER

PFX 1 Y 1
PFX 1   0     re         .

PFX 2 Y 1
PFX 2   0     re         .

PFX 3 Y 1
PFX 3   0     de          .

PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4   0     de          .

PFX 5 Y 1
PFX 5   0     dis         .

PFX 6 Y 1
PFX 6   0     dis         .

PFX 7 Y 1
PFX 7   0     con         .

PFX 8 Y 1
PFX 8   0     con         .

PFX 9 Y 1
PFX 9   0     in         .

PFX 10 Y 1
PFX 10   0     in         .

PFX 11 Y 1
PFX 11   0     pro         .

PFX 12 Y 1
PFX 12   0     pro         .

PFX 13 Y 1
PFX 13   0     un         .

PFX 14 Y 1
PFX 14   0     un         .

REP 90
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP alot a_lot
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP ear air
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion
REP size cise

SFX 15 Y 93
SFX 15   ый   ую           ый
SFX 15   ый   ому          [^ц]ый
SFX 15   ый   ом           [^ц]ый
SFX 15   ый   ой           [^ц]ый
SFX 15   ый   ого          [^ц]ый
SFX 15   ый   ое           [^ц]ый
SFX 15   ый   ою           [^ц]ый
SFX 15   ый   ему          цый
SFX 15   ый   ем           цый
SFX 15   ый   ей           цый
SFX 15   ый   его          цый
SFX 15   ый   ее           цый
SFX 15   ый   ая           ый
SFX 15   ой   ыми          [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 15   ой   ым           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 15   ой   ых           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 15   ой   ые           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 15   ой   ую           ой
SFX 15   ой   ому          ой
SFX 15   ой   ом           ой
SFX 15   ой   ого          ой
SFX 15   ой   ое           ой
SFX 15   ой   ими          [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 15   ой   им           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 15   ой   их           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 15   ой   ие           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 15   ой   ая           ой
SFX 15   й    ми           ый
SFX 15   й    ми           [гхк]ий
SFX 15   й    ми           [енржшщч]ий
SFX 15   й    м            ый
SFX 15   й    м            [гхк]ий
SFX 15   й    м            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 15   й    х            ый
SFX 15   й    х            [гхк]ий
SFX 15   й    х            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 15   й    е            ый
SFX 15   й    е            [гхк]ий
SFX 15   й    е            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 15   й    ю            ой
SFX 15   ийся уюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся имся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся имися        [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся ихся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся иеся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся емуся        [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся емся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся ейся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся егося        [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся ееся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся еюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ийся аяся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 15   ий   ую           [жшщч]ий
SFX 15   ий   ую           [гхк]ий
SFX 15   ий   яя           [ен]ий
SFX 15   ий   ому          [гхк]ий
SFX 15   ий   ом           [гхк]ий
SFX 15   ий   ой           [гхк]ий
SFX 15   ий   ого          [гхк]ий
SFX 15   ий   ое           [гхк]ий
SFX 15   ий   ою           [гхк]ий
SFX 15   ий   ему          [енржшщч]ий
SFX 15   ий   ем           [енржшщч]ий
SFX 15   ий   ей           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 15   ий   его          [енржшщч]ий
SFX 15   ий   ее           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 15   ий   ею           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 15   ий   ая           [жшщч]ий
SFX 15   ий   ая           [гхк]ий
SFX 15   ий   юю           [ен]ий
SFX 15   е    ми           [иы]е
SFX 15   е    м            [иы]е
SFX 15   е    х            [иы]е
SFX 15   0    ыми          в
SFX 15   0    ыми          ин
SFX 15   0    ым           в
SFX 15   0    ым           ин
SFX 15   0    ых           в
SFX 15   0    ых           ин
SFX 15   0    ы            в
SFX 15   0    ы            ин
SFX 15   0    у            в
SFX 15   0    у            ин
SFX 15   0    ому          ин
SFX 15   0    ом           в
SFX 15   0    ом           ин
SFX 15   0    ой           в
SFX 15   0    ой           ин
SFX 15   0    ого          ин
SFX 15   0    о            в
SFX 15   0    о            ин
SFX 15   0    а            в
SFX 15   0    а            ин

SFX 16 Y 14
SFX 16 ом ого ом
SFX 16 ом ому ом
SFX 16 ом ое ом
SFX 16 ом ая ом
SFX 16 ом ый [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 16 ом ий [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 16 ом ых [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 16 ом их [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 16 ом ым [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 16 ом им [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 16 ом ыми [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 16 ом ими [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 16 ом ые [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 16 ом ие [чхшщкжг]ом

SFX 17 Y 93
SFX 17   ый   ую           ый
SFX 17   ый   ому          [^ц]ый
SFX 17   ый   ом           [^ц]ый
SFX 17   ый   ой           [^ц]ый
SFX 17   ый   ого          [^ц]ый
SFX 17   ый   ое           [^ц]ый
SFX 17   ый   ою           [^ц]ый
SFX 17   ый   ему          цый
SFX 17   ый   ем           цый
SFX 17   ый   ей           цый
SFX 17   ый   его          цый
SFX 17   ый   ее           цый
SFX 17   ый   ая           ый
SFX 17   ой   ыми          [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 17   ой   ым           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 17   ой   ых           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 17   ой   ые           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 17   ой   ую           ой
SFX 17   ой   ому          ой
SFX 17   ой   ом           ой
SFX 17   ой   ого          ой
SFX 17   ой   ое           ой
SFX 17   ой   ими          [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 17   ой   им           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 17   ой   их           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 17   ой   ие           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 17   ой   ая           ой
SFX 17   й    ми           ый
SFX 17   й    ми           [гхк]ий
SFX 17   й    ми           [енржшщч]ий
SFX 17   й    м            ый
SFX 17   й    м            [гхк]ий
SFX 17   й    м            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 17   й    х            ый
SFX 17   й    х            [гхк]ий
SFX 17   й    х            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 17   й    е            ый
SFX 17   й    е            [гхк]ий
SFX 17   й    е            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 17   й    ю            ой
SFX 17   ийся уюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся имся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся имися        [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся ихся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся иеся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся емуся        [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся емся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся ейся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся егося        [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся ееся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся еюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ийся аяся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 17   ий   ую           [жшщч]ий
SFX 17   ий   ую           [гхк]ий
SFX 17   ий   яя           [ен]ий
SFX 17   ий   ому          [гхк]ий
SFX 17   ий   ом           [гхк]ий
SFX 17   ий   ой           [гхк]ий
SFX 17   ий   ого          [гхк]ий
SFX 17   ий   ое           [гхк]ий
SFX 17   ий   ою           [гхк]ий
SFX 17   ий   ему          [енржшщч]ий
SFX 17   ий   ем           [енржшщч]ий
SFX 17   ий   ей           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 17   ий   его          [енржшщч]ий
SFX 17   ий   ее           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 17   ий   ею           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 17   ий   ая           [жшщч]ий
SFX 17   ий   ая           [гхк]ий
SFX 17   ий   юю           [ен]ий
SFX 17   е    ми           [иы]е
SFX 17   е    м            [иы]е
SFX 17   е    х            [иы]е
SFX 17   0    ыми          в
SFX 17   0    ыми          ин
SFX 17   0    ым           в
SFX 17   0    ым           ин
SFX 17   0    ых           в
SFX 17   0    ых           ин
SFX 17   0    ы            в
SFX 17   0    ы            ин
SFX 17   0    у            в
SFX 17   0    у            ин
SFX 17   0    ому          ин
SFX 17   0    ом           в
SFX 17   0    ом           ин
SFX 17   0    ой           в
SFX 17   0    ой           ин
SFX 17   0    ого          ин
SFX 17   0    о            в
SFX 17   0    о            ин
SFX 17   0    а            в
SFX 17   0    а            ин

SFX 18 Y 93
SFX 18   ый   ую           ый
SFX 18   ый   ому          [^ц]ый
SFX 18   ый   ом           [^ц]ый
SFX 18   ый   ой           [^ц]ый
SFX 18   ый   ого          [^ц]ый
SFX 18   ый   ое           [^ц]ый
SFX 18   ый   ою           [^ц]ый
SFX 18   ый   ему          цый
SFX 18   ый   ем           цый
SFX 18   ый   ей           цый
SFX 18   ый   его          цый
SFX 18   ый   ее           цый
SFX 18   ый   ая           ый
SFX 18   ой   ыми          [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 18   ой   ым           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 18   ой   ых           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 18   ой   ые           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 18   ой   ую           ой
SFX 18   ой   ому          ой
SFX 18   ой   ом           ой
SFX 18   ой   ого          ой
SFX 18   ой   ое           ой
SFX 18   ой   ими          [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 18   ой   им           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 18   ой   их           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 18   ой   ие           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX 18   ой   ая           ой
SFX 18   й    ми           ый
SFX 18   й    ми           [гхк]ий
SFX 18   й    ми           [енржшщч]ий
SFX 18   й    м            ый
SFX 18   й    м            [гхк]ий
SFX 18   й    м            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 18   й    х            ый
SFX 18   й    х            [гхк]ий
SFX 18   й    х            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 18   й    е            ый
SFX 18   й    е            [гхк]ий
SFX 18   й    е            [енржшщч]ий
SFX 18   й    ю            ой
SFX 18   ийся уюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся имся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся имися        [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся ихся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся иеся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся емуся        [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся емся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся ейся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся егося        [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся ееся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся еюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ийся аяся         [шщ]ийся
SFX 18   ий   ую           [жшщч]ий
SFX 18   ий   ую           [гхк]ий
SFX 18   ий   яя           [ен]ий
SFX 18   ий   ому          [гхк]ий
SFX 18   ий   ом           [гхк]ий
SFX 18   ий   ой           [гхк]ий
SFX 18   ий   ого          [гхк]ий
SFX 18   ий   ое           [гхк]ий
SFX 18   ий   ою           [гхк]ий
SFX 18   ий   ему          [енржшщч]ий
SFX 18   ий   ем           [енржшщч]ий
SFX 18   ий   ей           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 18   ий   его          [енржшщч]ий
SFX 18   ий   ее           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 18   ий   ею           [енжшщч]ий
SFX 18   ий   ая           [жшщч]ий
SFX 18   ий   ая           [гхк]ий
SFX 18   ий   юю           [ен]ий
SFX 18   е    ми           [иы]е
SFX 18   е    м            [иы]е
SFX 18   е    х            [иы]е
SFX 18   0    ыми          в
SFX 18   0    ыми          ин
SFX 18   0    ым           в
SFX 18   0    ым           ин
SFX 18   0    ых           в
SFX 18   0    ых           ин
SFX 18   0    ы            в
SFX 18   0    ы            ин
SFX 18   0    у            в
SFX 18   0    у            ин
SFX 18   0    ому          ин
SFX 18   0    ом           в
SFX 18   0    ом           ин
SFX 18   0    ой           в
SFX 18   0    ой           ин
SFX 18   0    ого          ин
SFX 18   0    о            в
SFX 18   0    о            ин
SFX 18   0    а            в
SFX 18   0    а            ин
